Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-542
Immunization information system; immunization information; confidentiality;
violation; penalty.

Immunization
information in
the immunization information system established pursuant to section 71-541.01 is
confidential, and unrestricted immunization information may only be accessed pursuant to rules and regulations
of the Department of Health and Human Services. Unauthorized public
disclosure of such confidential information is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 54;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 10.